Louisiana, session 2026, SB215.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:574.2.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§574.2.2. Non-unanimous jury convictions; special committee on parole
A.(1) The Special Committee on Parole for Non-unanimous Jury
Convictions, hereinafter referred to as the "special committee", is hereby
created in the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, which shall be
authorized to enforce the provisions of this Section. The special committee shall
consist of the following members:
(a) Three retired appellate court judges or supreme court justices
Page 1 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
appointed by the governor.
(b) One retired district attorney or assistant district attorney appointed
by the governor from a list of three nominations by the Louisiana District
Attorneys Association.
(c) One retired public defender or assistant public defender appointed
by the governor from a list of three nominations by the state public defender.
(2) In addition to the appointment of the special committee members, the
governor shall also appoint one alternate member from each of the categories
established by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. These persons shall be of the
same qualifications as the special committee members and shall serve only in an
ad hoc capacity should any committee member be unable to serve for any
reason. The ad hoc member shall be from the same category as the member who
is unavailable to serve.
(3) All five special committee members shall be present for any hearing
on or in consideration of an application for relief. For all other administrative
purposes, four of the five special committee members shall constitute a quorum.
B.(1) The chairman of the special committee shall be appointed by the
governor. Additional officers may be elected by majority vote of the
membership of the committee. The salary of the special committee members
shall be the same as the salaries of the members of the Board of Pardons and
shall be established in the same manner.
(2) Ad hoc special committee members shall be paid a per diem at a rate
set by the special committee for services rendered due to the recusal or absence
of any committee member from any participation in any petitioner's application
or consideration.
C. All members appointed to the special committee shall be prohibited
from representing any petitioner or victim either directly or indirectly. Any
member of the special committee who has an existing personal, professional, or
financial transactions or who has had any previous personal, professional, or
Page 2 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
financial transactions involving or relating to the petitioner or victim shall be
recused from any participation in consideration of that petitioner's application.
D. The special committee shall meet not less than once per month per
calendar year to consider applications filed by petitioners. The dates shall be
determined by the chairman. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, persons
providing testimony may appear before the committee by means of
teleconference or telephone communication.
E. In accordance with the provisions of this Section, the special
committee shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To determine whether the petitioner was convicted of an offense by
a non-unanimous jury, and, if so, then whether that conviction resulted in a
miscarriage of justice.
(2) To determine the specific conditions of release from custody of any
petitioner to whom parole was granted pursuant to this Section.
(3) To keep a record of its actions and notify each correctional facility of
the special committee's final determination relating to petitioner's application.
(4) To take testimony under oath at a hearing or by deposition. Under
no circumstance shall the victim or the victim's family be compelled to testify
at any hearing set or otherwise convened by the special committee or under the
provisions of this Section.
(5) To notify the district attorney of the judicial district, or prosecuting
authority in the parish where the conviction occurred, of the petitioner's
application to the special committee.
(6) To notify the district attorney of the judicial district, or prosecuting
authority in the parish where the conviction occurred, of the special committee's
final determination relating to the petitioner's application.
(7) To perform any additional duties necessary to enforce the provisions
of this Section.
F.(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any
Page 3 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
person currently incarcerated who alleges a conviction for an offense rendered
by a non-unanimous jury shall be entitled to file an application with the special
committee in accordance with the provisions of this Section, regardless of the
term of imprisonment imposed.
(b) The petitioner shall use the Uniform Application for Special Parole
Consideration approved by the Supreme Court of Louisiana. The application
shall be signed by the petitioner and be accompanied by a certified copy of the
entirety of the record of the proceedings relative to the petitioner's direct appeal
of the conviction on which the petitioner's application is based, and the
petitioner's affidavit that the allegations contained in the application are true
and accurate to the best of petitioner's information and belief. If no direct
appeal has been taken, the application shall be accompanied by a certified copy
of the trial court record.
(c) Failure of the petitioner to provide supporting documentation with
an application shall not be grounds for denial of the petitioner's application.
However, if the petitioner submits an application without providing the
required certified copy, the petitioner shall include in his affidavit that he
requested a certified copy of the entirety of the record of the proceedings
relative to the petitioner's direct appeal, or trial court record, of the conviction
on which the petitioner's application is based from the clerk of court from the
parish of conviction. Thereafter, upon receipt of the documentation from the
clerk of court, the petitioner shall be allowed to supplement his application
prior to any hearing on the petitioner's application.
(d) Any documents requested by a petitioner pursuant to Subparagraph
(c) of this Paragraph from the clerk of court of the parish of conviction shall be
made available by the clerk of court to the petitioner no later than ninety days
after the request is made. A petitioner requesting a certified copy of the record
on direct appeal or trial court record for purposes of submitting with an
application for relief pursuant to this Section, shall be deemed indigent for
Page 4 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
purposes of the cost of production of the requested record. If the requested
documents are unavailable, the clerk of court shall certify the reasons why the
requested documents are unavailable and shall provide the certification to the
petitioner within ninety days of the request.
(e) The district attorney of the judicial district or prosecuting authority
in the parish where the conviction was obtained shall, in all instances, be
permitted to file with the special committee a written response to the
petitioner's application.
(2)(a) The petitioner shall have the burden of establishing by clear and
convincing evidence the non-unanimity of his conviction based exclusively upon
the existing certified copy of the entirety of the record submitted with the
application. If the petitioner is unable to establish that the verdict was
non-unanimous, the special committee shall summarily deny the petitioner's
application at a hearing without any further consideration, inquiry, or review
for relief under this Section. If the petitioner is able to establish that the verdict
was non-unanimous, the special committee shall then consider whether the
non-unanimous verdict resulted in a miscarriage of justice.
(b) In determining whether the non-unanimous jury verdict resulted in
a miscarriage of justice, evidence shall be limited to the certified copy of the
entirety of the record upon which the petitioner's application is based, any
testimony of the petitioner or victim, as provided by R.S. 46:1841 et seq., and
any written statement submitted by the district attorney of the judicial district
where the conviction was obtained. In its evaluation, the special committee may
also consider any of the following illustrative, non-exhaustive, non-mandatory
factors:
(i) Whether the non-unanimity was the result of juror votes to acquit.
(ii) Whether a juror voted to convict for a responsive verdict when the
petitioner was convicted of the offense charged.
(iii) Whether a juror voted to convict for the offense charged when the
Page 5 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
petitioner was convicted of a responsive verdict.
(iv) The overall strength of the state's case.
(v) The length of deliberations.
(vi) The nature of the offense.
(vii) The assistance of counsel for the applicant at trial and on appeal.
(viii) Any indicia of racial animus in the prosecution of the petitioner's
case.
(c) If the petitioner is serving sentences for multiple convictions, the
petitioner shall only be eligible to make a single application to the special
committee pursuant to this Section for the conviction relative to the offense for
which he is serving the longest sentence. If the petitioner is serving a sentence
for multiple convictions under a single bill of information or indictment, the
special committee shall consider the issue of non-unanimity for all counts.
(3)(a) The special committee may not grant or deny parole without a
hearing on the petitioner's application. The special committee shall schedule an
application for hearing at the soonest available committee meeting, but in no
event prior to the receipt of the certified copy of the petitioner's record of the
proceedings upon which the petitioner's application is based. In addition to
notifying the petitioner that the matter has been set for hearing, the special
committee shall notify the district attorney in the judicial district where the
conviction occurred and the victim, or relative of a deceased victim, of the time
and date of the hearing.
(b) In all instances, a unanimous vote of all five members of the special
committee shall be required for both an affirmative finding that the petitioner's
conviction was the result of a non-unanimous jury verdict and that the
non-unanimous verdict resulted in a miscarriage of justice.
G.(1) The provisions of this Section shall be the exclusive and sole
remedy for any petitioner applying for relief on the basis of being convicted by
a non-unanimous verdict. However, a claim for relief pursuant to this Section
Page 6 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
shall not preclude a petitioner from petitioning for relief under any other
provision allowed by law not related to the non-unanimous verdict issue.
Evidence of the non-unanimous verdict may be used at any other proceedings
not under the provisions of this Section subject to the limitations in the Code of
Evidence and Code of Criminal Procedure.
(2) Any grant or denial of parole by the special committee shall be
deemed as a final determination of the petitioner's application for special parole
consideration based on a non-unanimous jury verdict resulting in a miscarriage
of justice. A denial of the petitioner's application shall not be subject to appeal
or collateral attack nor shall the application be eligible for any reconsideration
or rehearing.
(3) All applications pursuant to this Section shall be filed within one year
of the effective date of this Section. The special committee shall not consider any
petitioner's application for parole filed thereafter pursuant to this Section.
(4) A grant or denial of parole pursuant to this Section may be a
consideration in any application made for a pardon by the petitioner when
eligible.
(5) If an application is granted resulting in parole release, the term of
supervised release shall be the remaining term of the original sentence of
conviction or as commuted by the governor.
(6) All qualified victims, as provided by R.S. 46:1841 et seq., shall be
afforded opportunity and access to all victim services available through the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, victim services section,
throughout the entirety of the process from initial application through the
duration of any potential parole release.
H. The implementation of the provisions of this Section shall be subject
to the appropriation of funds by the legislature for this purpose.
Section 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall terminate three years after the
effective date of this Act.
Page 7 of 9
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-343 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 215
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.